Nebraska, session 109, LB408.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB408 LB408
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Special Education Teacher Forgivable Loan Program Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that Nebraska elementary and
secondary schools have had difficulty filling open and necessary job
positions, including special education teachers.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to assist individuals
studying to become special education teachers by supporting forgivable
loans to those individuals who commit to teaching in Nebraska following
their certification as a teacher with a special education endorsement.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Special Education Teacher Forgivable
Loan Program Act:
(1) Department means the State Department of Education;
(2) Eligible institution means a not-for-profit college or
university that (a) is located in Nebraska, (b) is accredited by an
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education and determined to be acceptable by the State Board of
Education, and (c) has a special education teacher education program;
(3) Eligible noncitizen means an individual who:
(a) Is a United States national, including a native of American
Samoa or Swains Island;
(b) Is a lawful permanent resident with a Form I-551, I-151, or
I-551C issued by the United States Government;
(c) Is a conditional permanent resident of the United States;
(d) Has an Arrival-Departure Record I-94 from the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services showing a status of Refugee, Asylum
Granted, Parolee, Conditional Entrant, or Cuban-Haitian Entrant;
(e) Holds a T nonimmigrant status visa or is a child of an
individual who holds a T-1 nonimmigrant status visa;
(f) Is a battered immigrant-qualified alien who is a victim of abuse
by such individual's spouse or parent who is a citizen or permanent
resident;
-2-

LB408 LB408
2025 2025
(g) Is a battered immigrant-qualified alien who is a child of a
person designated as such under the federal Violence Against Women Act;
or
(h) Is a citizen of the Republic of Palau, the Republic of the
Marshall Islands, or the Federated States of Micronesia;
(4) Eligible student means an individual who:
(a) Is a United States citizen or an eligible noncitizen;
(b) Is a high school graduate or the equivalent of a high school
graduate;
(c) Is enrolled in good standing at a state college in Nebraska or
the University of Nebraska;
(d) Is seeking initial certification as a teacher with an
endorsement in special education; and
(e) Has applied for federal financial aid grants and state
scholarships and grants to cover tuition and fees; and
(5) Teacher education program means a program of study that results
in obtaining a bachelor's degree, master's degree, or special education
endorsement that meets the education requirements for certification
pursuant to sections 79-806 to 79-816.
Sec. 4. (1) The Special Education Teacher Forgivable Loan Program
is created and shall be administered by the department.
(2) The department may award a forgivable loan to an eligible
student to pay for instate tuition, or the equivalent of instate tuition
at any eligible institution.
(3) The department may award up to twenty-five forgivable loans each
academic year for each eligible institution.
(4) An eligible student who is awarded a forgivable loan under the
Special Education Teacher Forgivable Loan Program shall enter a contract
with the department prior to the department dispersing any money for such
loan. Such contract shall contain at least the following terms:
(a) The eligible student shall only be eligible to receive a loan
-3-

LB408 LB408
2025 2025
under the program for the first five years that the eligible student is
enrolled in a teacher education program;
(b) The loan shall only be used to pay for any remaining tuition
remaining due to the eligible institution attended by the eligible
student after applying all awarded federal and state financial aid grants
and scholarships;
(c) The eligible student shall begin teaching special education at a
Nebraska elementary or secondary school within one year after graduating
with a degree in education; and
(d) The eligible student shall teach special education at a Nebraska
elementary or secondary school for:
(i) Five consecutive years after graduating with a degree in
education; or
(ii) The equivalent number of years of loans taken.
(5)(a) When an eligible student who was awarded any forgivable loan
under this section graduates from an eligible institution, the department
shall determine the dollar amount of forgivable loans such student
received each year and the overall total dollar amount of forgivable
loans paid to such eligible student.
(b)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(ii) of this subsection,
for each year after graduating from an eligible institution that an
eligible student complies with the terms of the contract under this
section, the department shall forgive twenty percent of the total dollar
amount of forgivable loans paid to such eligible student. After the fifth
consecutive year of compliance with the terms of the contract, the
department shall notify the eligible student that the total amount of
forgivable loans provided under this section that were owed by such
eligible student are forgiven.
(ii) For an eligible student that received less than five total
years of forgivable loans pursuant to this section, for each year after
graduating from an eligible institution that an eligible student complies
-4-

LB408 LB408
2025 2025
with the terms of the contract under this section, the department shall
forgive the amount of one year's worth of forgivable loans paid to such
eligible student. After the eligible student complies with the terms of
the contract for the number of years that the eligible student received a
forgivable loan pursuant to this section, the department shall notify the
eligible student that the total amount of forgivable loans provided under
this section that were owed by such eligible student are forgiven.
(6) If an eligible student who accepted a forgivable loan under this
section fails to comply with the terms of the contract described in this
section, such eligible student may receive a deferment from the
obligation of repayment as specified in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act.
(7) Any eligible student who accepted a forgivable loan under this
section who fails to comply with the terms of the contract described in
this section and who does not receive a deferment from the obligation of
repayment as described in this section shall repay the remaining balance
of any forgivable loan with simple interest at a rate of five percent per
year. Any repayment under this section shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(8) The department shall provide each eligible student who accepts a
forgivable loan under this section with a description of the obligations
of such eligible student under the terms of the contract described in
this section.
Sec. 5. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations relating to the Special Education Teacher Forgivable Loan
Program Act.
-5-